Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.100

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of licenses, unlicensed practice, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The dental quality assurance commission is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 460 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.